Maryland, session 2025, HB1478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–4A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Home health care” includes any of the following services:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1478*

HOUSE BILL 1478
(1) Audiology and speech pathology;
(2) Dietary and nutritional services;
(3) Drug services;
(4) Home health aide;
(5) Laboratory;
(6) Medical social services;
(7) Nursing;
(8) Occupational therapy;
(9) Physical therapy;
(10) Provision of invasive medical equipment; and
(11) Home medical equipment services.
(f) (1) “Residential service agency” means any person that is engaged in a
nongovernmental business of employing or contracting with individuals to provide home
health care for compensation to an unrelated sick or disabled individual in the residence of
that individual.
(2) “Residential service agency” includes any agency that employs or
contracts with individuals directly for hire as home health care providers.
(3) “Residential service agency” does not include:
(i) A home health agency that is licensed under the provisions of
Subtitle 4 of this title;
(ii) A person required to be licensed as a home health agency under
the provisions of Subtitle 4 of this title;
(iii) A home–based hospice care program that is licensed under the
provisions of Subtitle 9 of this title;
(iv) A hospital that is licensed under the provisions of Subtitle 3 of
this title;
(v) A related institution that is licensed under the provisions of
Subtitle 3 of this title;

HOUSE BILL 1478 3
(vi) Personal care providers under the Medical Assistance Personal
Care Program;
(vii) Any person practicing a health occupation that the person is
authorized to practice under the Health Occupations Article;
(viii) A nursing referral service agency that is licensed under Subtitle
4B of this title;
(ix) A group of persons licensed under the same title of the Health
Occupations Article practicing as a business; or
(x) Residential rehabilitation services providers approved under
regulations adopted by the State mental health authority.
SUBTITLE 4C. HOME HEALTH CARE PROVIDER DIRECTORY.
19–4C–01.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “HOME HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO PROVIDES HOME HEALTH CARE, AS DEFINED IN § 19–4A–01 OF THIS TITLE,
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL IS EMPLOYED BY OR CONTRACTS WITH
A RESIDENTIAL SERVICE AGENCY.
19–4C–02.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN AN ONLINE
DIRECTORY OF EACH HOME CARE PROVIDER IN THE STATE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MODEL THE DIRECTORY ON EXISTING
DIRECTORIES.
(B) THE ONLINE DIRECTORY SHALL ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL SEEKING HOME
HEALTH CARE SERVICES TO SEARCH THE INFORMATION IN THE DIRECTORY AND
IDENTIFY A HOME HEALTH CARE PROVIDER BASED ON SPECIFIED CRITERIA, SUCH
AS LANGUAGE PROFICIENCY, CERTIFICATIONS, PREVIOUS EXPERIENCE, OR
SPECIAL SKILLS.
(C) THE DIRECTORY MAY INCLUDE FUNCTIONALITIES THAT:
(1) CONNECT AN INDIVIDUAL SEEKING HOME– AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES WITH A QUALIFIED PROVIDER BY:

HOUSE BILL 1478
(I) PROVIDING A STATEWIDE SYSTEM THROUGH WHICH AN
INDIVIDUAL CAN IDENTIFY AND ACCESS AVAILABLE INFORMATION ON HOME
HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS; AND
(II) ASSISTING AN INDIVIDUAL IN NAVIGATING THE HOME– AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES SYSTEM IN THE STATE;
(2) SUPPORT THE RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION OF QUALIFIED
HOME HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS BY:
(I) HELPING INDIVIDUALS TO BECOME AND REMAIN
ENROLLED AS HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES PROVIDERS UNDER THE
MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(II) ACTIVELY RECRUITING HOME HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS
THROUGH JOB ADVERTISEMENTS AND JOB FAIRS;
(III) CONNECTING HOME HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS TO
TRAINING AND OPPORTUNITIES FOR PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT; AND
(IV) FACILITATING ACCESS FOR HOME HEALTH CARE
PROVIDERS TO HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER BENEFITS; AND
(3) FACILITATING COMMUNICATION WITH HOME HEALTH CARE
PROVIDERS IN THE EVENT OF A PUBLIC HEALTH OR OTHER EMERGENCY.
(D) (1) THE DIRECTORY SHALL INCLUDE EACH PROVIDER’S:
(I) FULL NAME;
(II) IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(III) JOB TITLE;
(IV) COMPLETED TRAINING AND CERTIFICATIONS;
(V) GENDER;
(VI) ABUSE AND NEGLECT REPORTS; AND
(VII) ASSOCIATED RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AGENCY.
(2) THE DIRECTORY MAY INCLUDE EACH HOME CARE PROVIDER’S:

HOUSE BILL 1478 5
(I) LANGUAGE PROFICIENCY; AND
(II) WORK HISTORY.
(E) (1) EACH RESIDENTIAL SERVICE AGENCY SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE TO THE DEPARTMENT EACH HOME HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER’S:
1. FULL NAME;
2. ADDRESS;
3. E–MAIL ADDRESS; AND
4. PHONE NUMBER; AND
(II) ANNUALLY COLLECT AND SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT
THE ONLINE DIRECTORY INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION IN THE MANNER REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) IF A HOME HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IS NOT EMPLOYED BY OR
DOES NOT CONTRACT THROUGH A RESIDENTIAL SERVICE AGENCY, THE HOME
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY PROVIDE THE INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT DISCLOSE TO THE PUBLIC THE
INFORMATION PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPHS (1)(I)1, 2, AND 3 AND (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CHARGE A HOME HEALTH PROVIDER A FEE FOR
MAINTAINING THE DIRECTORY.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.